District of Columbia statutes.
20-715

Inventory of successor personal representative.

Except as provided in section 20-731 , within 3 months of appointment, a supervised successor personal representative shall either file a new inventory to replace the inventory filed by a previous personal representative or file a written consent to the items as listed and valued in such previous inventory.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(mm), 42 DCR 63

History

This section is referenced in § 20-711.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 20-715.

Prior Codifications

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.

Editor's Notes